src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Noun
लऱका:लऱक FIRSTLONG ; ! larka, 'boy'
कुअाँ:कु FIRSTSHORT ; ! kuã, 'well'
घर SECOND ; ! ghar, 'house'
लऱकी THIRD ; ! larkii, 'girl'

LEXICON FIRSTLONG ! first decl, long vow
+N+Msc+Sg+Nom:ा # ;
+N+Msc+Sg+Obl:े # ;
+N+Msc+Sg+Voc:े # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Nom:े # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Obl:ों # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Voc:ो # ;

LEXICON FIRSTSHORT ! first decl, short vow
+N+Msc+Sg+Nom:अाँ # ;
+N+Msc+Sg+Obl:एँ # ;
+N+Msc+Sg+Voc:एँ # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Nom:एँ # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Obl:आों # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Voc:ओ # ;

LEXICON SECOND ! 2nd decl
+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: # ;
+N+Msc+Sg+Obl: # ;
+N+Msc+Sg+Voc: # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Nom:ों # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Obl:ों # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Voc:ो # ;

LEXICON THIRD ! 3rd decl
+N+Fem+Sg+Nom: # ;
+N+Fem+Sg+Obl: # ;
+N+Fem+Sg+Voc: # ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Nom:याँ # ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Obl:यों # ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Voc:यो # ;
